Utah statutes.
67-19-3.1.   Principles guiding interpretation of chapter and adoption of rules.

(1)  The department shall establish a career service system designed in a manner that will provide for the effective implementation of the following merit principles:

(a)  recruiting, selecting, and advancing employees on the basis of their relative ability, knowledge, and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for initial appointment;

(b)  providing for equitable and competitive compensation;

(c)  training employees as needed to assure high-quality performance;

(d)  retaining employees on the basis of the adequacy of their performance and separating employees whose inadequate performance cannot be corrected;

(e)  fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of human resource administration without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, political affiliation, age, or disability, and with proper regard for their privacy and constitutional rights as citizens;

(f)  providing information to employees regarding their political rights and the prohibited practices under the Hatch Act; and

(g)  providing a formal procedure for advancing grievances of employees:

(i)  without discrimination, coercion, restraint, or reprisal; and

(ii)  in a manner that is fair, expeditious, and inexpensive for the employee and the agency.

(2)  The principles in Subsection (1) shall govern interpretation and implementation of this chapter.

